Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8311
Currently licensed facilities; legislative intent.

If the Legislature finds that it is necessary for the protection of the public to make changes in the statutes regulating categories of facilities after reviewing the criteria in section 71-8310 and considering governmental and societal costs and benefits, it is the intent of the Legislature that changes be implemented which are the least restrictive regulatory provisions consistent with protecting the public health, safety, and welfare.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 117.